Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 15

Weapons

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

12-15-201. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Auxiliary law enforcement officer” means a person certified by the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training and approved by the county sheriff or chief of police of a municipality where he or she is acting as an auxiliary law enforcement officer if the auxiliary law enforcement officer has completed the minimum training requirements and is certified as an auxiliary law enforcement officer in accordance with the commission;

“Certified law enforcement officer” means any appointed or elected law enforcement officer or county sheriff employed by a public law enforcement department, office, or agency who:

Is responsible for the prevention and detection of crime and the enforcement of the criminal, traffic, or highway laws of this state; and

Has met the selection and training requirements for certification set by the commission;

“Employee of a local detention facility” means a person who:

Is employed by a county sheriff or municipality that operates a local detention facility and whose job duties include:

Securing a local detention facility;

Monitoring inmates in a local detention facility; or

Administering the daily operation of the local detention facility;

Has completed the minimum training requirements; and

Has obtained authorization from the chief of police of the law enforcement agency or county sheriff and the authorization is:

In writing;

In the possession of the employee of a local detention facility; and

Produced upon demand at the request of any law enforcement officer or owner or operator of any of the prohibited places under § 5-73-306;

“In good standing” means that the person:

Was not terminated;

Did not resign in lieu of termination; or

Was not subject to a pending disciplinary action or criminal investigation at the time of his or her retirement or resignation from the public law enforcement department, office, or agency;

“Local detention facility” means a jail or other facility that is operated by a municipal police force or a county sheriff for the purpose of housing persons charged with or convicted of a criminal offense; and

“Public law enforcement department, office, or agency” means any public police department, county sheriff's office, or other public agency, force, or organization whose primary responsibility as established by law, statute, or ordinance is the enforcement of the criminal, traffic, or highway laws of this state.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment by No. 415 added definitions for “Auxiliary law enforcement officer” and “In good standing”.

The 2013 amendment by No. 1220 inserted present (3) and (5).

The 2017 amendment deleted (1)(B); and redesignated the former introductory language of (1) and (1)(A) as (1).

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1332, § 2; 2007, No. 675, § 1; 2013, No. 415, § 2; 2013, No. 1220, § 2; 2017, No. 957, § 4.

12-15-202. Eligibility to carry concealed handgun.

Any certified law enforcement officer, auxiliary law enforcement officer, employee of a local detention facility, prosecuting attorney, or deputy prosecuting attorney designated by the prosecuting attorney may carry a concealed handgun if the certified law enforcement officer, auxiliary law enforcement officer, employee of a local detention facility, prosecuting attorney, or deputy prosecuting attorney designated by the prosecuting attorney:

Is presently in the employ of a public law enforcement department, office, or agency;

Is authorized by the public law enforcement department, office, or agency to carry a firearm in the course and scope of his or her duties;

Is not subject to any disciplinary action that suspends his or her authority as a certified law enforcement officer, auxiliary law enforcement officer, employee of a local detention facility, prosecuting attorney, or deputy prosecuting attorney designated by the prosecuting attorney;

Is carrying a badge and appropriate written photographic identification issued by the public law enforcement department, office, or agency identifying him or her as a certified law enforcement officer, auxiliary law enforcement officer, employee of a local detention facility, prosecuting attorney, or deputy prosecuting attorney designated by the prosecuting attorney;

Is not otherwise prohibited under federal law;

Is not under the influence of alcohol or another intoxicating or hallucinatory drug or substance; and

Has fingerprint impressions on file with the Division of Arkansas State Police Automated Fingerprint Identification System.

A concealed handgun may be carried by any retired law enforcement officer or retired auxiliary law enforcement officer acting as a retired auxiliary law enforcement officer who:

Retired in good standing from service with a public law enforcement department, office, or agency for reasons other than mental disability;

Immediately before retirement was a certified law enforcement officer authorized by a public law enforcement department, office, or agency to carry a firearm in the course and scope of his or her duties;

Is carrying appropriate written photographic identification issued by a public law enforcement department, office, or agency identifying him or her as a retired and former certified law enforcement officer;

Is not otherwise prohibited under federal law from receiving or possessing a firearm;

Has fingerprint impressions on file with the system together with written authorization for state and national level criminal history record screening;

During the most recent twelve-month period has met, at the expense of the retired law enforcement officer, the standards of this state for training and qualification for active law enforcement officers to carry firearms;

Before his or her retirement, worked or was employed as a law enforcement officer or acted as an auxiliary law enforcement officer for an aggregate of ten (10) years or more; and

Is not under the influence of or consuming alcohol or another intoxicating or hallucinatory drug or substance.

The chief law enforcement officer of the city or county shall keep a record of all retired law enforcement officers authorized to carry a concealed handgun in his or her jurisdiction and shall revoke any authorization for good cause shown.

The Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police shall keep a record of all retired Department ofArkansas State Police or Division of Arkansas State Police officers authorized to carry a concealed handgun in the state and shall revoke any authorization for good cause shown.

A firearms instructor certified by the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training who is employed by any law enforcement agency in this state may certify or recertify that a retired law enforcement officer has met the training and qualification requirements for certification set by the commission for active law enforcement officers to carry firearms.

A retired law enforcement officer shall pay the expenses for meeting the training and qualification requirements described in subdivision (c)(1)(A) of this section.

A firearms instructor who certifies or recertifies that a retired law enforcement officer has met the training and qualification requirements for certification set by the commission for active law enforcement officers to carry firearms under subdivision (c)(1)(A) of this section shall complete and submit any required paperwork to the commission.

Any certified law enforcement officer or retired law enforcement officer carrying a concealed handgun under this section is not subject to the prohibitions and limitations of § 5-73-306.

Any presently employed certified law enforcement officer authorized by another state to carry a concealed handgun shall be entitled to the same privilege while in this state, but subject to the same restrictions of this section, provided that the state which has authorized the officer to carry a concealed handgun extends the same privilege to presently employed Arkansas-certified law enforcement officers.

The director shall make a determination as to which states extend the privilege to carry a concealed handgun to presently employed Arkansas-certified law enforcement officers and shall then determine which states' officers' authority to carry concealed handguns will be recognized in Arkansas.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Pursuant to Acts 2015, No. 1161, § 6, the amendments to this section by Acts 2015, No. 1161, § 1, are superseded by the amendments to this section by Acts 2015, No. 958, § 1.

Amendments. The 2007 amendment by No. 134 inserted (b)(1)(G) and (c), and redesignated the following subdivisions accordingly; and made related changes.

The 2007 amendment by No. 675 deleted former (b)(1)(C) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

The 2013 amendment by No. 415 rewrote (a) and (b).

The 2013 amendment by No. 539 inserted "prosecuting attorney, or deputy prosecuting attorney designated by the prosecuting attorney" twice in theintroductory language of (a) and in(a)(4).

The 2013 amendment by No. 1220 inserted “or employee of a local detention facility" in the introductory language of (a) and in (a)(3) and (4).

The 2015 amendment by No. 958, in the introductory language of (a), deleted “acting as an auxiliary law enforcement officer” preceding “employee of a local detention facility” and inserted the second occurrence of “auxiliary law enforcement officer, employee of a local detention facility”; substituted “certified law enforcement officer, auxiliary law enforcement officer, employee of a local detention facility, prosecuting attorney, or deputy prosecuting attorney designated by the prosecuting attorney” for “law enforcement officer or employee of a local detention facility by the public law enforcement department, office, or agency” in (a)(3); and inserted “auxiliary law enforcement officer” in (a)(4).

The 2017 amendment inserted “or consuming” preceding “alcohol” in (b)(1)(H).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (a)(7); and, in (b)(2)(B), substituted the first occurrence of “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” and substituted “retired Department of Arkansas State Police or Division of Arkansas State Police officers” for “retired department officers”.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Survey of Legislation, 2003 Arkansas General Assembly, Law Enforcement and Emergency Management, Concealed Handgun, 26 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 428.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning duties of board members, was repealed by Acts 1999, No. 1133, § 2. The section was derived from Acts 1995, No. 1332, § 3.

[Reserved.]

Effective Dates. Acts 2007, No. 1086, § 2: Apr. 4, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that law enforcement officials throughout the state require increased resources to combat drug crimes; that this act provides needed financial relief and will escalate efforts throughout the state to prevent the use and spread of drugs; and that this act should become effective as soon as possible to effectuate its intent. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1332, § 1; 1997, No. 92, § 1; 1997, No. 302, § 1; 2001, No. 251, § 1; 2001, No. 585, § 1; 2003, No. 348, § 1; 2007, No. 134, § 1; 2007, No. 675, § 2; 2013, No. 415, § 3; 2013, No. 539, § 3; 2013, No. 1220, § 3; 2015, No. 958, § 1; 2015, No. 1161, § 1; 2017, No. 957, § 5; 2019, No. 910, §§ 5871, 5872.

12-15-203. [Repealed.]

Subchapter 3

— Law Enforcement Personnel

12-15-301. Sale of county-issued firearms to deputies.

(1)When any county sheriff's deputy retires or otherwise honorably terminates employment with the county sheriff, the officer may purchase any firearm which had been issued to the officer by the county sheriff.

The county sheriff, with the approval of the county judge, may sell the firearm to the deputy at its fair market value as determined by the county sheriff.

In regard to the sale of such firearms, the county sheriff is not required to comply with any other law of this state regarding the sale of county property.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 451, § 1.

12-15-302. Award of pistol upon retirement or death of a county sheriff or deputy county sheriff.

When a deputy county sheriff retires from service or dies while still employed with the county sheriff's department, in recognition of and appreciation for the service of the retiring or deceased deputy county sheriff, the county sheriff may award the pistol carried by the deputy county sheriff at the time of his or her death or retirement from service to:

The deputy county sheriff; or

The deputy county sheriff's spouse if the spouse is eligible under applicable state and federal laws to possess a firearm.

(1)A county sheriff may retain his or her pistol he or she carried at the time of his or her retirement from service.

If the county sheriff dies while he or she is still in office, his or her spouse may receive or retain the pistol carried by the county sheriff at the time of his or her death if the spouse is eligible under applicable state and federal laws to possess a firearm.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 60, § 1.

Subchapter 2

— Concealed Handgun Permits